Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB769.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 67.160 is amended to read as follows:
The county judge/executive may rent, for the period that a courthouse is being built or
repaired, or cannot be used, a house not more than a mile and one quarter from the public
square or courthouse site, as a temporary courthouse. He or she may also rent, for the
period that the clerk's office or jail is being built or repaired, a house within the same
distance of the public square or courthouse site, as a temporary clerk's office or jail. The
rent for such temporary courthouse, clerk's office or jail shall be paid out of the county
treasury.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/7/2025 4:30 PM Jacketed